rules.regex
[] -> h || .#. [b |c |d |f |g |m |p |t] _ ? + ^Verb ?* %^Séimhiú;
[] -> h || .#. s _ [a |e |i |o |u |á |é |í |ó |ú |l |n | r] ?* ^Verb ?* %^Séimhiú;
[]-> d ' || .#. _ [a |e |i |o |u |á |é |í |ó |ú | f h] ?+ %^Verb ?* %^Séimhiú;
%^Séimhiú -> [];
i g h -> [] || _ %^igh [[\%^Root]|.#.];
a i g h -> [] || _%^aigh [\%^Root];
%^igh -> [];
%^aigh -> [];
%^Root -> [];
%^Slender -> [];
